Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
House District 18 is bounded by a line beginning at a point on the Municipality of Anchorage boundary north of the mouth of Fire Creek, southerly through Knik Arm to the creek, southerly along the creek to Mink Creek, south to a point due west of the end of Richner Road, east to and along the road to Werre Street, south to Mink Creek, east to Parks Creek, south to the New Glenn Highway, south to Birchwood Loop Road, east to Old Glenn Highway, south to Darby Road, west to Caspian Court, west to Lake Ridge Drive, south to Old Glenn Highway, west to Fish Hatchery Road, east to Savage Drive, south to Carol Creek, west to Eagle River Access Road, west to the New Glenn Highway, west to a point on the highway just west of the intersection of Breckenridge Drive and Farm Avenue, west to Fort Richardson Military Reservation Base, south along the base boundary to Glenn Highway, west along the highway to Centennial Park, south along the park boundary to Boundary Avenue, west to Muldoon Road, south to Duben Avenue, west to Oklahoma Street, north to Access Road, west to Patterson Street, north along a nonvisible line to the Glenn Highway, west to McCarrey Street, north to Vandenberg Avenue, west to Pine Street, north to McPhee Avenue, west to the end of McPhee Avenue, continuing west along the Elmendorf Air Force Base boundary to the Alaska Railroad, west along the railroad to Port Access Loop Road, north to Loop Road, east to Bluff Drive, west to Ocean Dock Road, south to Terminal Lease (North Star) Access Road, west to Knik Arm shore, west through Knik Arm to the Municipality of Anchorage boundary, east along the boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,639 and a variance of -0.22%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 17, one senator.

House District 19-Senate District J:
Muldoon.

House District 19 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Boniface Parkway and Pilgrim Drive, east to Plymouth Drive, north to 6th Avenue, east to Staedem Drive, east to 6th Avenue, east to Donna Drive, east to Turpin Street, north to 6th Avenue, east to Jordt Circle, east to Fredericks Drive, north and east to Patterson Street, north to Duben Avenue, east to Muldoon Road, north to Boundary Avenue, east to Fort Richardson Military Firing Range, south along the military boundary to a Power Line Right-of-way (ROW), west along the ROW to the end of Northern Lights Boulevard, west to Augustine Drive, north to Lake George Drive, north to Chandalar Drive, east to 21st Avenue, west to Paxson Drive, north to Chester Creek South Branch, west to a nonvisible extension of Colgate Drive, west to and along Colgate Drive to Baxter Road, north to Beaver Place, north to an access road to MOA Parks and Rec area, west along the Parks and Rec boundary to the end of Chester Creek Middle Branch, north to the end of Craig Drive, west to Penn Circle, south to 20th Avenue, west to Boniface Parkway, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,841 and a variance of 1.07%. The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 20, one senator.

House District 20-Senate District J:
Mountain View/Wonder Park.

House District 20 is bounded by a line beginning at the western end of Thompson Avenue, east to Taylor Street, north to Elmendorf Air Force Base, east along the base boundary to McPhee Avenue, east to Pine Street, south to Vandenberg Avenue, east to Mc Carrey Street, south to Glenn Highway, east to a point on the highway just north of Patterson Street, south to intersection of Patterson Street and Access Road, east to Oklahoma Street, south to Duben Avenue, west to Patterson Street, south to Fredericks Drive, west and south to Jordt Circle, west to 6th Avenue, west to Turpin Street, south to Donna Drive, west to 6th Avenue, west to Staedem Drive, west to 6th Avenue, west to Plymouth Drive, south to Pilgrim Drive, west to Boniface Parkway, south to Debarr Road, west to Pine Street, north to San Roberto Avenue, west to Hoyt Street, north to 7th Avenue, west to Penland Parkway, west to Airport Heights Drive, north to Mountain View Drive, east to Porcupine Drive, west to Rampart Drive, east to Commercial Drive, west to Meyer Street, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,837 and a variance of 1.04%. The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 19, one senator.

House District 21-Senate District K:
Baxter Bog.

House District 21 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Penn Circle and Craig Drive, east to the end of Craig Drive, south along a nonvisible line to the end of Chester Creek Mid Branch, east along the MOA Parks and Rec boundary to an access Road, east to Beaver Place, south to Baxter Road, south to Colgate Drive, east to the end of Colgate Drive, continuing east along a nonvisible extension to Chester Creek South Branch, east to Paxson Drive, south to 21st Avenue, east to Chandalar Drive, south to Lake George Drive, south to Augustine Drive, south to Northern Lights Boulevard, east to Muldoon Road, continuing east along a Power Line ROW to Fort Richardson Firing Range, south along the range boundary to the northeast corner of Far North Bicentennial Park, west along the park boundary to the end of Tudor Road, west to Boniface Parkway, north to College Drive, east to Pembroke Street, north to Penn Circle, east and north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,850 and a variance of 1.13%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 22, one senator.

House District 22-Senate District K:
University/ Airport Heights.

House District 22 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Airport Heights Drive and Penland Parkway, east along the parkway to 7th Avenue, east to Hoyt Street, south to San Roberto Avenue, east to Pine Street, south to Debarr Road, east to Boniface Parkway, south to 20th Avenue, east to Penn Circle, south and west to Pembroke Street, south to College Drive, west to Boniface Parkway, south to Tudor Road, west to Dale Street, north to 43rd Avenue, west to the intersection of Piper Street and the southern boundary of the Alaska Psychiatric Institute (API), west along the API boundary to Lake Otis Parkway, north to 20th Avenue, east to Toklat Street, north to 17th Avenue, east to Logan Street, north to 16th Avenue, east to Alder Drive, north to 15th Avenue, east to Airport Heights Drive, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,831 and a variance of 1.01%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 21, one senator.

House District 23-Senate District L:
Downtown/Rogers Park.

House District 23 is bounded by a line beginning at a point on the Municipality of Anchorage boundary in Knik Arm west of the Port of Anchorage, east to the Terminal Lease Lot (North Star) Access Road, east to Ocean Dock Road, north to Bluff Drive, east to Loop Road, west to Port Access Loop Road, south to Alaska Railroad, east along the railroad to Elmendorf Air Force Base, south and east along the base boundary to the end of Thompson Avenue, south to and along Meyer Street to Commercial Drive, east to Rampart Drive, south to Porcupine Drive, south to Mountain View Drive, west to Airport Heights Drive, south to 15th Avenue, west to Alder Drive, south to 16th Avenue, west to Logan Street, south to 17th Avenue, west to Toklat Street, south to 20th Avenue, west to Lake Otis Road, south to Northern Lights Boulevard, west to C Street. North to Fireweed Lane, west to D Street, north to 22nd Avenue, east to C Street, north to 15th Avenue, west to E Street, north to 13th Avenue, west to L Street, north to 11th Avenue, west to P Street, north to 9th Avenue, west to the end of 9th Avenue, continuing west to the shore of Knik Arm, northwest through Knik Arm to the Municipality of Anchorage, north along the municipality boundary to point of beginning. The house district has a population of 15,847 and a variance of 1.11%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 24, one senator.

House District 24-Senate District L:
Midtown/Taku.

House District 24 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of C Street and Northern Lights Boulevard, east to Lake Otis Road, south to Lake Otis Parkway, south to the southern boundary of the Alaska Psychiatric Institute, east along the API boundary to Piper Street, south to 43rd Avenue, east to Dale Street, south to Tudor Road, east to Bragaw Street, south to the end of Bragaw Street, continuing south along a Power Line ROW through Far North Bicentennial Park to its southern boundary, west along the park boundary to the end of Dowling Road, west along Dowling Road to Laurel Street, south to its intersection with 64th Avenue, west along a nonvisible line to Lake Otis Parkway, south to 68th Avenue, west to Brayton Drive, south to its intersection with Lore Road, west along a nonvisible line to the intersection of Homer Drive and 76th Avenue, west to Nathan Drive, north to Nathan Circle, west to intersect a stream running south out of Campbell Creek, north along the stream to Campbell Creek, west to the Alaska Railroad, north to 68th Avenue, west to C Street, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,812 and a variance of 0.88%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 23, one senator.

House District 25-Senate District M:
East Spenard.

House District 25 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of L Street and 13th Avenue, east to E Street, south to 15th Avenue, east to C Street, south to 22nd Avenue, west to D Street, south to Fireweed Lane, east to C Street, south to Raspberry Road, west to Arlene Street, south to 69th Court, west to Smaldon Street, north to Raspberry Street, west to Blackberry Street, north to Jewel Lake Road, north to International Airport Road, east to Northwood Drive, north to Spenard Road, east to the Alaska Railroad, north to 36th Avenue, east to Lois Drive, north to 33rd Avenue, east to Minnesota Drive, north to Spenard Thru-Way, north and east to L Street, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,836 and a variance of 1.04%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 26, one senator.

House District 26-Senate District M:
Turnagain/Inlet View.

House District 26 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Postmark Drive and Point Woronzof Road, east to Earthquake Park, north along the park boundary to the shore of Knik Arm, north through Knik Arm to the Municipality of Anchorage, east along the municipality boundary to a point north of where a nonvisible extension of 9th Avenue would intersect the shore of Knik Arm, southerly through Knik Arm to the shore and easterly along the extension to 9th Avenue, east to P Street, south to 11th Avenue, east to L Street, south to the Spenard Thru-Way, south to and along Minnesota Drive to 33rd Avenue, west to Lois Drive, south to 36th Avenue, west to the Alaska Railroad, south to Spenard Road, west to Northwood Drive, south to International Airport Road, west to Postmark Drive,
north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,823 and a variance of 0.96%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 25, one senator.

House District 27-Senate District N:
Sand Lake.

House District 27 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Point Woronzof Road and Postmark Drive, south on Postmark Drive to International Airport Road, east to Jewel Lake Road, south to Blackberry Street, south to Raspberry Road, east to Smaldon Street, south to 69th Court, east to Arlene Street, north to Raspberry Road, east to Cheryl Street, south to 70th Avenue, west to Chad Street, south to 76th Avenue, west to Minnesota Drive, south to Dimond Boulevard, west to Vernye Place, north to 90th Avenue, west to Campbell Creek, south to Northwood Street, north to Tasha Drive, west to Flamingo Drive, south to 88th Avenue, west to Lakehurst Drive, south to 89th Court, west to Jewel Terrace Street, north to 88th Avenue, west to Gloralee Street, south to Jewel Lake Park, west to Jewel Lake, north around the lake shore to a point due east of the end of Emerald Circle, west to and along Emerald Circle to Emerald Street, north to 88th Avenue, west to Jade Street, south to Dimond Boulevard, west to Endicott Street, continuing due west along a nonvisible line to Kincaid Park, south along the park boundary to the shore of Turnagain Arm, south through Turnagain Arm to the Municipality of Anchorage, following the municipality boundary west and northeasterly (including Fire Island) to a point due north of Earthquake Park, south through Knik Arm to and along the park’s western boundary to Point Woronzof Road, west to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,820 and a variance of 0.94%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 28, one senator.

House District 28-Senate District N:
Bayshore/Klatt.

House District 28 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Kincaid Park and the shore of Turnagain Arm, north to a nonvisible line extending due west from the intersection of Endicott Street and Dimond Boulevard, east along the line to Dimond Boulevard, east to Jade Street, north to 88th Avenue, east to Emerald Street, south to Emerald Circle, east to Jewel Lake, north around the lake shore to its intersection with the southern boundary of Jewel Lake Park, east to Gloralee Street, north to 88th Avenue, east to Jewel Terrace Street, south to 89th Court, east to 88th Avenue, east to Flamingo Drive, north to Tasha Drive, east to Northwood Street, south to Campbell Creek, east to 90th Avenue, east to Vernye Place, south to Dimond Boulevard, east to Minnesota Drive, south to O’Malley Road, east to Johns Road, south to Mariner Drive, east to Furrow Creek, east to Alaska Railroad, south to Cross Road, east to Oceanview Drive, south and east to Old Seward Highway, south to De Armoun Road, east to New Seward Highway, south to Little Rabbit Creek, west to the mouth of Little Rabbit Creek, south through Turnagain Arm to the Municipality of Anchorage, northwest along the municipality boundary to a point due south of Kincaid Park, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,839 and a variance of 1.06%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 27, one senator.

House District 29-Senate District O:
Campbell/ Independence Park.

House District 29 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Cheryl Street and Raspberry Road, east along Raspberry Road to the Alaska Railroad, south to Campbell Creek, east to a small intersecting stream, south to Nathan Circle, east to Nathan Drive, south to 76th Avenue, east to Brayton Drive, south to Abbot Road, east to E Dimond Circle, east to Dimond Boulevard, east to its intersection with Little Campbell Creek, east to Lake Otis Parkway, south to 88th Avenue, west to Golovin Street, south to Abbott Road, east to Lake Otis Parkway, south to O’Malley Road, west to Minnesota Drive, north to a point due east of a nonvisible extension of 76th Avenue, east to and along 76th Avenue to Chad Street, north to 70th Avenue, east to Cheryl Street, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,846 and a variance of 1.10%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 30, one senator.

House District 30-Senate District O:
Lore/Abbott.

House District 30 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Bragaw Street and Tudor Road, east along Tudor Road to its intersection with Muldoon Road, east to Far North Bicentennial Park, east, south and west along the park boundary to Lodge Pole Court, west to Nettleton Drive, south to Hillside Drive, south to O’Malley Road, west to Main Tree Drive, north to Lone Tree Drive, west to W Tree Drive, west to Birch Road, north to 104th Avenue, west to Our Road, south to Little Campbell Creek, west to a point on the creek due south of Hanley Circle, north to and along Hanley Circle to 101st Avenue, west to Abbott Loop Road, south to O’Malley Road, west to Lake Otis Parkway, north to Abbott Road, west to Golovin Street, north to 88th Avenue, east to Lake Otis Parkway, north to Little Campbell Creek, west to E Dimond Boulevard, west to E Dimond Circle, west to Abbott Road, west to Brayton Drive, north to 68th Avenue, east to Lake Otis Parkway, north to a point due west of the intersection of Laurel Street and 64th Avenue, east along a nonvisible line to said intersection, north on Laurel Street to Dowling Road, east to the end of Dowling Road east on a Power Line ROW to a perpendicular Power Line ROW (extending south from the end of Bragaw Street), north along the ROW to Bragaw Street, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,839 and a variance of 1.06%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 29, one senator.

House District 31-Senate District P:
Huffman/Ocean View.

House District 31 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Johns Road and O’Malley Road, east along O’Malley Road to Abbott Loop Road, north to 101st Avenue, east to Hanley Circle, south to Little Campbell Creek, east to Our Road, north to 104th Avenue, east to Birch Road, south to Tree Drive, east to Lone Tree Drive, east to Main Tree Drive, south to O’Malley Road, east to Hillside Drive, south to Rabbit Creek Road, east to Old Rabbit Creek Road, south to Rabbit Creek, west along the creek to 140th Avenue, west to De Armoun Road, west to Old Seward Highway, north to Oceanview Drive, west and north to Cross Road, west to Alaska Railroad, north to Furrow Creek, west to Mariner Drive, west to Johns Road, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,811 and a variance of 0.88%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 32, one senator.

House District 32-Senate District P:
Chugach State Park.

House District 32 is bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of the eastern boundary of Centennial Park and the Glenn Highway, east along the highway to Fort Richardson Military Reservation, north along the reservation boundary to Eagle River, east along its northern bank to Eagle Loop Road, north to Driftwood Bay Drive, east to Highland Ridge Drive, east to its end, north along a nonvisible line to Eagle River Lane, north to Steeple Drive, north to Chugach State Park, north along the park boundary to Meadow Creek, east to its headwaters, east along a nonvisible line to Peters Creek, south to its headwaters, southeast to Peril Peak, continuing southeasterly along a natural ridge line running along Whiteout Glacier, south to Eagle Glacier to its intersection with Chugach National Forest, east along the forest boundary to the Municipality of Anchorage, south along the municipality boundary to the City of Whittier, east along the city boundary to the south shore of Passage Canal, east around Strong Point, westerly along the northern shore of Blackstone Bay to Kenai Peninsula Borough, westerly along the borough boundary to the Alaska Railroad, south to Johnson Pass Trail, north to Lynx Creek Road, west to Lynx Creek, south along a nonvisible line to Juneau Creek, west to Fresno Creek, west to Seward Highway, north to Pin Pass Creek, west to Resurrection Creek, north to Gold Gulch, west to the common boundary of Chugach National Forest and Kenai National Wildlife Refuge, north along the common boundary to the south shore of Turnagain Arm, northerly to the common boundary of Kenai Peninsula Borough and the Municipality of Anchorage, northwesterly to a point on the common boundary just south of the mouth of Little Rabbit Creek, north to the creek, east to New Seward Highway, north to De Armoun Road, east to 140th Avenue, east to Rabbit Creek, east to Rabbit Creek Road, north to Hillside Drive, north to Lodge Pole Court, east to Far North Bicentennial Park, north along the park boundary to Fort Richardson Firing Range, north along the range boundary to Centennial Park, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,329 and a variance of -2.20%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 31, one senator.

House District 33-Senate District Q:
Kenai/Soldotna.

House District 33 is bounded by a line beginning at the northeasternmost corner of Kenai City, easterly and southerly along the city boundary to Kenai Spur Highway, south to Sports Lake Road, east to Moser Road, south to the end of Moser Road, continuing south along a nonvisible line to the Alaska Natural Gas Pipeline ROW, westerly along the ROW to Delta Avenue, west to Gibson Boulevard, south to Kilowatt Avenue, west to Kenai Spur Highway, south to Soldotna City, easterly, southerly, and westerly along the city boundary to the Kenai National Wildlife Refuge, westerly along the refuge boundary to Soldotna City, easterly along the city boundary to Gas Well Road, east to Echo Lake Road, south to Evelyn Lane, east to the lane’s end, continuing east along a nonvisible line to Slikok Creek, south to Sterling Highway, south to Coal Creek, west to Kalifornsky Beach Road, north to Kasilof Beach Stub, west to the eastern shore of Cook Inlet, northerly along the shore to Kenai City, north along the city boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 16,466 and a variance of 5.06%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 34, one senator.

House District 34-Senate District Q:
Rural Kenai.

House District 34 contains all uplands within the area of the Kenai Peninsula Borough bounded by a line beginning at the northwesternmost point of Kenai City, proceeding west to the centerline of Cook Inlet, northeasterly along centerline to the Kenai Peninsula Borough, easterly along the borough boundary to a point due north of the common boundary of Kenai National Wildlife Refuge Area and Chugach National Forest, south through Turnagain Arm to the common boundary, south along the common boundary to Gold Gulch, east to Resurrection Creek, south to Juneau Creek, south to Slaughter Creek, north to Trout Lake, following its northern shore to Thurman Creek, northwest to common boundary of Kenai National Wilderness Area and Chugach National Forest, south along the common boundary to the Kenai Fjords National Park, south and west along the park boundary to a point where the Kenai National Wilderness Area boundary diverges north, north and west along the wilderness boundary to Cytex Creek, west to Deep Creek, southerly along a series of tributaries and feeder creeks to Anchor River, west to the Anchor River Feeder Creek, west along a nonvisible line to North Fork River, west to North Fork Tributary, west to its end, continuing west along a nonvisible line to Kutayfa Avenue, west to Sterling Highway, north to Whiskey Gulch Spur Road, west to the eastern shore of Cook Inlet, north along the shore to Kenai City, north along the city boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 16,409 and a variance of 4.69%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 33, one senator.

House District 35-Senate District R:
Homer/Seward.

House District 35 includes all uplands and islands in the area bounded by a line beginning at the intersection of Tlikakila River and Kenai Peninsula Borough, east along the river to Summit Lake, east along the lake’s south shore to its easternmost point, east along a nonvisible line to Lake Clark National Park & Wilderness Area, south along the park and wilderness boundary to Drift River, east to the shore of Cook Inlet, east across the inlet to the northwesternmost point of Kenai City, southerly along the city boundary to the shore of Cook Inlet, south along the shore to Whiskey Gulch Spur Road, east to Sterling Highway, south to Kutayfa Avenue, east to its end, continuing east along a nonvisible line to the end of North Fork Tributary, south to North Fork River, east along the river to its headwaters, south to and along a feeder creek to Anchor River, east to a feeder creek just west of its headwaters, northeasterly along Anchor River Feeder Creek to its natural end, east along a nonvisible line to Swift Creek, north to its natural end, north along a nonvisible line to Deep Creek Tributary, north to Deep Creek, northwesterly along Deep Creek to Cytex Creek, east to Kenai National Wilderness Area, east and south along the wilderness boundary to Kenai Fjords National Park, easterly along the park boundary to Chugach National Forest, north along the forest boundary to Thurman Creek, south to Slaughter Creek, south to Juneau Creek, north to Resurrection Creek, northeasterly to Pin Pass Creek, east to the Seward Highway, south to Fresno Creek, east to Juneau Creek at Canyon Creek, east along Juneau Creek to its headwaters, northeasterly along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of Lynx Creek, north to Lynx Creek Road, north to Johnson Pass Trail, south to the Alaska Railroad, north to Kenai Peninsula Borough, east, south and north along the borough boundary to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 16,436 and a variance of 4.87%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 36, one senator.

House District 36-Senate District R:
Kodiak.

House District 36 includes all uplands and islands in the area bounded by a line beginning at the northwesternmost corner of Lake and Peninsula Borough, east and south along the borough boundary to the Kodiak Island Borough, including all of the Kodiak Island Borough, continuing westerly along Katmai National Park boundary to the Lake and Peninsula Borough, northerly along the borough boundary to point of beginning. The house district has a population of 14,928 and a variance of -4.76%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 35, one senator.

House District 37-Senate District S:
Bristol Bay/ Aleutians.

House District 37 includes all uplands and islands in the area bounded by a line beginning at the northwesternmost corner of the Bristol Bay ANRC, east along the ANRC boundary to Lake and Peninsula Borough, south along the borough boundary to Bristol Bay Borough, east and south around the borough boundary to Katmai National Park, south along the park boundary to Lake and Peninsula Borough, west along the borough boundary to Aleutians East Borough, including all of the Aleutians East Borough, all of the islands of the Aleutian Chain, and the Pribilof Islands, easterly to the common boundary of the Calista and Bristol Bay ANRCs at Hagemeister Strait, north to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 15,150 and a variance of -3.34%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 38, one senator.

House District 38-Senate District S:
Bethel.

House District 38 includes all uplands and islands in the area bounded by a line beginning at the easternmost point of the common boundary of Wade Hampton and Bethel Census Areas at Hazen Bay, east along the common boundary to the Yukon Kuskokwim Portage Trail, south to Upper Kalskag City, northerly around the city boundary to Lower Kalskag City, southerly around the city boundary to the Kuskokwim River, southwesterly along its north bank to the common boundary of Lower Yukon and Kuspuk REAAs, southeasterly along the common REAA boundary to the common Calista and Bristol Bay ANRC boundary, southwesterly along the common ANRC boundary to Hagemeister Strait, northwesterly offshore to include Nunivak Island and St. Mathew Island, southeasterly back to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 14,921 and a variance of -4.80%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 37, one senator.

House District 39-Senate District T:
Bering Straits.

House District 39 includes all uplands and islands in the area bounded by a line beginning at the westernmost point of the Bering Land Bridge National Preserve, east and north along the preserve’s southern boundary to a nonvisible line, east to the Northwest Arctic Borough, east along the borough boundary to the Bering Straits and Yukon Koyukuk REAAs, south along the common REAA boundary to the Bering Straits and Iditarod REAAs, southerly along the common REAA boundary to the Bering Straits and Lower Yukon REAAs, east along the common REAA boundary to a point just north of the Atchuelinguk River, south along a nonvisible line to the headwaters of the Atchuelinguk River, southwesterly along the Atchuelinguk River to Pilot Station City, southerly around the city boundary to the Yukon River, south across the river to Hills Slough, south to Kashunuk Slough, west to Kashunuk River, southwesterly along Kashunuk River approximately 15 miles to a point opposite the Pikmik River, southwesterly along a nonvisible line to the Pikmik River, south to its head waters, south along a nonvisible line to the common boundary of the Wade Hampton and Bethel Census Areas, westerly along the common boundaries to Hazen Bay, northwesterly offshore to include St. Lawrence Island, northeasterly to include Little Diomede Island, easterly back to point of beginning.
The house district has a population of 14,996 and a variance of -4.32%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 40, one senator.

House District 40-Senate District T:
Arctic.

House District 40 includes the North Slope Borough, the Northwest Arctic Borough, and an area of land due west of the Northwest Arctic Borough enclosed by the Bering Land Bridge National Preserve as its southern boundary, west along the preserve boundary to the shore of Bering Strait, west through the strait to the nautical 3-mile limit, north along the limit back to the Northwest Arctic Borough to close.
The house district has a population of 15,155 and a variance of -3.31%.
The house district will elect one house member and, with House District 39, one senator.